Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-2,107
Student personnel services; supervision.

The State Board of Education shall provide supervision and leadership to assure that appropriate student personnel services are provided by the schools and other agencies of this state. Student personnel services shall include school guidance, counseling, testing services, and all other necessary and appropriate noninstructional services for students. The State Department of Education shall provide general supervision and coordination of student personnel services as such services relate to instructional and educational services provided by schools and other agencies.

Laws 1971, LB 660, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 348, § 11;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-321.03;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 111.